South Dakota, session 2026, HB1157.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. There is created the Aquatic Invasive Species Task Force for the purpose of
studying the ecological damage and associated costs of infestations of aquatic invasive
species, as defined in § 41-13A-1, and to make recommendations to the Legislature on
policies to address the issue.
The task force consists of:
(1) The following members appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate:
(a) Two senators;
(b) Two individuals representing non-governmental water organizations;
(c) One individual representing water development districts; and
(d) One individual from a tribal organization with experience in issues related
to aquatic invasive species;
(2) The following members appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives:
(a) Two members of the House of Representatives;
(b) One biologist with expertise in aquatic invasive species;
(c) One non-governmental individual representing the river, lake, and stream
recreation and resort industry;
(d) One individual representing a non-governmental outdoor recreation
organization; and
(e) One individual representing a non-governmental agricultural organization;
(3) One individual appointed by the secretary of the Department of Game, Fish and
Parks;
(4) One individual appointed by the secretary of the Department of Agriculture and
Natural Resources; and
(5) One individual appointed by the secretary of the Department of Tourism.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.258.34 2 1157
The initial appointments must be made no later than April 30, 2026. If there is a
vacancy on the task force, the vacancy is to be filled in the same manner as the original
appointment.
Section 2. The task force shall present a report to the Executive Board of the Legislative
Research Council no later than November 30, 2026, at which point the work of the task force
concludes. The report must address:
(1) The current condition, impacts, and potential future damage of aquatic invasive
species;
(2) Techniques, methods, strategies, and best practices to prevent, contain, and
mitigate aquatic invasive species;
(3) Cost estimates regarding the methodologies determined in subdivision (2);
(4) Short-term and long-term funding to support identified best practices; and
(5) Any other issue the task force deems appropriate in addressing aquatic invasive
species.
Section 3. There is appropriated $50,000 from the general fund, to the Legislative Research
Council, for expenses associated with administering the Aquatic Invasive Species Task Force.
Section 4. The Executive Board of the Legislative Research Council shall approve vouchers
and the state auditor shall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized in this Act.
Section 5. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated shall
revert in accordance with the procedures prescribed in chapter 4-8.
Section 6. Whereas, this Act is necessary for the support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act shall be in
full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.